espeak-data/dictsource/ja_rules
// Original defition by puzzlet, Modified by Logue.
// This file is UTF8 encoded

.L01 ア ァ カ ガ    サ ザ    タ ダ    ナ    ハ バ パ ㇵ マ    ヤ ャ ラ ㇻ ワ ヷ ヮ
.L02 イ ィ キ ギ    シ ジ ㇱ チ ジ    ニ    ヒ ビ ピ ㇶ ミ          リ ㇼ ヰ ヸ
.L03 ウ ゥ ク グ ㇰ ス ズ ㇲ ツ ヅ    ヌ    フ ブ プ ㇷ ム ㇺ ユ ュ ル ㇽ    ヴ
.L04 エ ェ ケ ゲ    セ ぜ    テ デ    ネ    ヘ ベ ペ ㇸ メ          レ ㇾ ヱ ヹ
.L05 オ ォ コ ゴ    ソ ゾ    ト ド ㇳ ノ ㇴ ホ ボ ポ ㇹ モ    ヨ ョ ロ ㇿ ヲ ヺ

// ヵとヶは読みがない

.L06 ア イ ウ エ オ ァ ィ ゥ ェ ォ
.L07 カ キ ク ケ コ
.L08 ガ ギ グ ゲ ゴ
.L09 サ シ ス セ ソ
.L10 ザ ジ ズ ぜ ゾ
.L11 タ       テ ト
.L12    チ ツ
.L13 ダ       デ ド
.L14    ヅ ヅ
.L15 ナ ニ ヌ ネ ノ
.L16 ハ ヒ    ヘ ホ
.L17       フ
.L18 バ ビ ブ ベ ボ
.L19 パ ピ プ ペ ポ
.L20 マ ミ ム メ モ
.L21 ヤ    ユ    ヨ
.L22       ル    ロ
.L23 ラ リ    レ
.L24 ワ ヰ    ヱ ヲ ヮ
.L25 ヷ ヸ ヴ ヹ ヺ

.L26 ン

// アイヌ語
.L27 ㇰ ㇱ ㇲ ㇳ ㇴ ㇵ ㇶ ㇷ ㇸ ㇹ ㇺ ㇻ ㇼ ㇽ ㇾ ㇿ

.replace
// full-width hiragana
 あ ア
 い イ
 う ウ
 え エ
 お オ
 か カ
 き キ
 く ク
 け ケ
 こ コ
 が ガ
 ぎ ギ
 ぐ グ
 げ ゲ
 ご ゴ
 さ サ
 し シ
 す ス
 せ セ
 そ ソ
 ざ ザ
 じ ジ
 ず ズ
 ぜ ゼ
 ぞ ゾ
 た タ
 ち チ
 つ ツ
 て テ
 と ト
 だ ダ
 ぢ ヂ
 づ ヅ
 で デ
 ど ド
 な ナ
 に ニ
 ぬ ヌ
 ね ネ
 の ノ
 は ハ
 ひ ヒ
 ふ フ
 へ ヘ
 ほ ホ
 ば バ
 び ビ
 ぶ ブ
 べ ベ
 ぼ ボ
 ぱ パ
 ぴ ピ
 ぷ プ
 ぺ ペ
 ぽ ポ
 ま マ
 み ミ
 む ム
 め メ
 も モ
 や ヤ
 ゆ ユ
 よ ヨ
 ら ラ
 り リ
 る ル
 れ レ
 ろ ロ
 わ ワ
 ゐ ヰ
 を ヲ
 ゑ ヱ
 ん ン

 ぁ ァ
 ぃ ィ
 ぅ ゥ
 ぇ ェ
 ぉ ォ
 っ ッ
 ゃ ャ
 ゅ ュ
 ょ ョ
 ゎ ヮ

// half-width katakana
 ｱ ア
 ｲ イ
 ｳ ウ
 ｴ エ
 ｵ オ
 ｶ カ
 ｷ キ
 ｸ ク
 ｹ ケ
 ｺ コ
 ｶﾞ ガ
 ｷﾞ ギ
 ｸﾞ グ
 ｹﾞ ゲ
 ｺﾞ ゴ
 ｻ サ
 ｼ シ
 ｽ ス
 ｾ セ
 ｿ ソ
 ｻﾞ ザ
 ｼﾞ ジ
 ｽﾞ ズ
 ｾﾞ ゼ
 ｿﾞ ゾ
 ﾀ タ
 ﾁ チ
 ﾂ ツ
 ﾃ テ
 ﾄ ト
 ﾀﾞ ダ
 ﾁﾞ ヂ
 ﾂﾞ ヅ
 ﾃﾞ デ
 ﾄﾞ ド
 ﾅ ナ
 ﾆ ニ
 ﾇ ヌ
 ﾈ ネ
 ﾉ ノ
 ﾊ ハ
 ﾋ ヒ
 ﾌ フ
 ﾍ ヘ
 ﾎ ホ
 ﾊﾞ バ
 ﾋﾞ ビ
 ﾌﾞ ブ
 ﾍﾞ ベ
 ﾎﾞ ボ
 ﾊﾟ パ
 ﾋﾟ ピ
 ﾌﾟ プ
 ﾍﾟ ペ
 ﾎﾟ ポ
 ﾏ マ
 ﾐ ミ
 ﾑ ム
 ﾒ メ
 ﾓ モ
 ﾔ ヤ
 ﾕ ユ
 ﾖ ヨ
 ﾗ ラ
 ﾘ リ
 ﾙ ル
 ﾚ レ
 ﾛ ロ
 ﾜ ワ
 ｦ ヲ
 ﾝ ン

 ｧ ァ
 ｨ ィ
 ｩ ゥ
 ｪ ェ
 ｫ ォ
 ｯ ッ
 ｬ ャ
 ｭ ュ
 ｮ ョ

.group ア
       ア      a
       アォ    ao

.group イ
       イ      i
       イァ    ja
       イェ    je
       イョ    jo

.group ウ
       ウ      u
       ウァ    ua
       ウィ    wi
       ウェ    we
       ウォ    wo

.group エ
       エ      e
       エゥ    eu

.group オ
       オ      o
       オァ    oa

.group カ
       カ      ka

.group キ
       キ      ki
       キィ    kji
       キェ    kje
       キャ    kja
       キュ    kju
       キョ    kjo

.group ク
       ク      ku
       クァ    qua
       クィ    qui
       クゥ    qu
       クェ    que
       クォ    quo
       クヮ    kwa

.group ケ
       ケ      ke

.group コ
       コ      ko

.group ガ
       ガ      ga

.group ギ
       ギ      gi
       ギィ    gji
       ギェ    gje
       ギャ    gja
       ギュ    gju
       ギョ    gjo

.group グ
       グ      gu
       グァ    gua
       グィ    gui
       グェ    gue
       グォ    guo
       グヮ    gwa

.group ゲ
       ゲ      ge

.group ゴ
       ゴ      go

.group ㇰ
       ㇰ      xku

.group ヶ
       ヶ      xke

.group サ
       サ      sa

.group シ
       シ      Si
       シャ    Sa
       シュ    Su
       シェ    Se
       ショ    So

.group ス
       ス      su

.group セ
       セ      se

.group セ゜
       セ゜    ce

.group ソ
       ソ      so

.group ㇱ
       ㇱ      xsi

.group ㇲ
       ㇲ      xsu

.group ザ
       ザ      za

.group ジ
       ジ      dZi
       ジェ    dZe
       ジャ    dZa
       ジュ    dZu
       ジョ    dZo

.group ズ
       ズ      zu
       ズァ    zua
       ズィ    zi
       ズェ    zue
       ズォ    zuo

.group ゼ
       ゼ      ze

.group ゾ
       ゾ      dzo

.group タ
       タ      ta

.group チ
       チ      tSi
       チャ    tSa
       チュ    tSu
       チェ    tSe
       チョ    tSo

.group ツ
       ツ      tsu
       ツァ    tsa
       ツィ    tsi
       ツェ    tse
       ツォ    tso

.group テ
       テ      te
       ティ    ti
       テョ    tjo

.group ト
       ト      to
       トゥ    tu

.group ㇳ
       ㇳ      xto

.group ダ
       ダ      da

.group ヂ
       ヂ      dz\i
       ヂャ    dz\ja
       ヂュ    dz\ju
       ヂョ    dz\jo

.group ヅ
       ヅ      dzu

.group デ
       デ      de
       ディ    di
       デョ    djo

.group ド
       ド      do
       ドゥ    du

.group ツ゜
       ツ゜    tu

.group ト゜
       ト゜    tu

.group ナ
       ナ      na

// ɲi ?
.group ニ
       ニ      ni
       ニェ    nie
       ニャ    nia
       ニュ    niu
       ニョ    nio

.group ヌ
       ヌ      nu
       ヌァ    nua
       ヌィ    nui
       ヌェ    nue
       ヌゥ    nuu

.group ネ
       ネ      ne

.group ノ
       ノ      no

.group ㇴ
       ㇴ      xnu

.group ハ
       ハ      ha
       ハ (_   wa

.group ヒ
       ヒ      Ci
       ヒャ    Ca
       ヒュ    Cu
       ヒェ    Ce
       ヒョ    Co

.group フ
       フ      fu
       ファ    fa
       フィ    fi
       フェ    fe
       フォ    fo

// hè
.group ヘ
       ヘ      he

.group ホ
       ホ      ho

.group バ
       バ      ba

.group ビ
       ビ      bi
       ビャ    bja
       ビェ    bje
       ビュ    bju
       ビョ    bjo

.group ブ
       ブ      bu

.group ベ
       ベ      be

.group ボ
       ボ      bo

.group パ
       パ      pa

.group ピ
       ピ      pi
       ピャ    pja
       ピュ    pju
       ピェ    pje
       ピョ    pjo

.group プ
       プ      pu

.group ペ
       ペ      pe

.group ポ
       ポ      po

.group ㇵ
       ㇵ      xha

.group ㇶ
       ㇶ      xhi

.group ㇷ
       ㇷ      xhu

.group ㇸ
       ㇸ      xhe

.group ㇹ
       ㇹ      xho

.group マ
       マ      ma

.group ミ
       ミ      mi
       ミャ    mja
       ミィ    mji
       ミュ    mju
       ミェ    mje
       ミョ    mjo

.group ム
       ム      mu

// mè
.group メ
       メ      me

.group モ
       モ      mo

.group ㇺ
       ㇺ      xm

.group ヤ
       ヤ      ja

.group ユ
       ユ      ju

.group ヨ
       ヨ      jo

.group ラ
       ラ      ra

.group リ
       リ      ri
       リィ    rji
       リェ    rje
       リャ    rja
       リュ    rju
       リョ    rjo

.group ル
       ル      ru

.group レ
       レ      re

.group ロ
       ロ      ro

.group ㇻ
       ㇻ      xra

.group ㇼ
       ㇼ      xri

.group ㇽ
       ㇽ      xru

.group ㇾ
       ㇾ      xre

.group ㇿ
       ㇿ      xro

.group ワ
       ワ      wa

.group ヰ
       ヰ      wi

.group ヱ
       ヱ      we

.group ヲ
       ヲ      wo

.group ヷ
       ヷ      va

.group ヸ
       ヸ      vi

.group ヴ
       ヴ      vu
       ヴァ    va
       ヴィ    vi
       ヴェ    ve
       ヴォ    vo
       ヴャ    vja
       ヴュ    vju
       ヴョ    vjo

.group ヹ
       ヹ      ve

.group ヺ
       ヺ      vo

.group ン
       ン      N\

.group ッ
       ッ (L07 k
       ッ (L08 g
       ッ (L09 s
       ッ (L10 z
       ッ (L11 t
       ッ (L12 ts
       ッ (L13 d
       ッ (L14 dz
       ッ (L15 n
       ッ (L16 h
       ッ (L17 f
       ッ (L18 b
       ッ (L19 p
       ッ (L20 m
       ッ (L21 j // ??
       ッ (L22 r
       ッ (L23 l
       ッ (L24 w // ??
       ッ (L25 v // ??
       ッ (L27 x // ??

.group ー
  L01) ー      a
  L02) ー      i
  L03) ー      u
  L04) ー      e
  L05) ー      o
  L26) ー      n

.group
       .
       ː
